Florida, session 2026, HB143.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
775.085, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
775.085 Evidencing prejudice while committing offense;
reclassification.—
(1)(a) The penalty for any felony or misdemeanor shall be
reclassified as provided in this subsection if the commission of
such felony or misdemeanor evidences prejudice based on the
race, color, ancestry, ethnicity, religion, sexual orientation,
national origin, homeless status, or advanced age, or political
ideology of the victim:
1. A misdemeanor of the second degree is reclassified to a
misdemeanor of the first degree.
2. A misdemeanor of the first degree is reclassified to a
felony of the third degree.
3. A felony of the third degree is reclassified to a
felony of the second degree.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb143-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 143 2026
4. A felony of the second degree is reclassified to a
felony of the first degree.
5. A felony of the first degree is reclassified to a life
felony.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb143-00